test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-20vaeitsj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - väitsʼ: # Noun (20) väitsʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Nom: väitsʼ
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Gen: väidse
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Par: väist
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Ill: väiste
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Ine: [väidsen, väidseh, väidsehn]
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Ela: väidsest
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+All: väidsele
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Ade: väidsel
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Abl: väidselt
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Tra: väidses
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Ter: väidseniq
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Abe: väidseldäq
     väitsʼ+N+Sg+Com: väidsegaq
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Nom: väidseq
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Gen: [väitsi, väiste]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Par: väitsi
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [väitsihe, väitsi, väitside]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Ine: [väidsin, väidsih, väidsihn, väisten, väisteh, väistehn]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Ela: [väidsist, väistest]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+All: [väidsile, väistele]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Ade: [väidsil, väistel]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Abl: [väidsilt, väistelt]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Tra: [väidsis, väistes]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Ter: [väidsiniq, väisteniq]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Abe: [väidsildäq, väisteldäq]
     väitsʼ+N+Pl+Com: [väitsigaq, väistegaq]
